Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,190
Board; chairperson; meetings;
quorum; personnel; employ.

The board shall elect annually
from its members a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. The board
shall meet at least once a year at a time and place fixed by the board. Three
members shall constitute a quorum. The board may employ such technical and clerical assistants
and incur such expense as may be necessary to properly carry out the Professional Landscape Architects Act.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 7, p. 1862;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 6.